District of Columbia statutes.
49-508

Execution of sentences.

The sentences of said courts, whether of fine or imprisonment, shall be executed by the United States Marshal for the District of Columbia in the same manner as are sentences of the criminal courts of said District.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 635, ch. 146, § 61
1981 Ed., § 39-808.
1973 Ed., § 39-708.